Montana, session 2025, LC1386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Report of school immunizations and exemptions. (1) A governing
authority shall ensure that each school required to obtain student immunization records under 20-5-109 submits
an annual report to the department of public health and human services on the immunization records obtained
by each school. The report must provide information on the outcomes of immunization record collection efforts
required under 20-5-109 and include the following data:
(a) the total school enrollment;
(b) the number and percentage of students who provide the school with written evidence of having
received the immunizations required under 20-5-403;
(c) the number and percentage of students who provide the school with a written medical
exemption statement for one or more of the required immunizations;
(d) the number and percentage of students who provide the school with an affidavit of a religious
exemption for one or more of the required immunizations; and
(e) the number and percentage of students for whom the school does not have written evidence of
immunization as required under 20-5-406 or the affidavit or medical exemption statement required under 20-5-
405.
(2) Information on the medical and religious exemptions must be broken down to identify the
number and percentage of students exempted from each required immunization.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1386.1
(3) The report:
(a) may not include any individually identifiable information; and
(b) must be provided to the department no later than December 1 each year.
(4) The department shall aggregate the information received under this section and make a report
available online that summarizes by county each element of the information required under subsection (1).

Section 2. Section 20-5-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-109. Nonpublic school requirements for compulsory enrollment exemption. To qualify its
students for exemption from compulsory enrollment under 20-5-102, a nonpublic or home school:
(1) shall maintain records on pupil attendance and disease immunization and, make the records
available to the county superintendent of schools on request, and for nonpublic schools, comply with the
requirements of [section 1];
(2) shall provide at least the minimum aggregate hours of pupil instruction in accordance with 20-1-
301 and 20-1-302;
(3) must be housed in a building that complies with applicable local health and safety regulations;
(4) shall provide an organized course of study that includes instruction in the subjects required of
public schools as a basic instructional program pursuant to 20-7-111; and
(5) in the case of home schools, shall notify the county superintendent of schools of the county in
which the home school is located in each school fiscal year of the student's attendance at the school."

Section 3. Section 20-5-408, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-408. Enforcement. (1) The governing authority of any school other than a postsecondary
school shall prohibit from further attendance any pupil allowed to attend conditionally who has failed to obtain
the immunizations required by 20-5-403(1) within time periods established by the department until that pupil
has been immunized as required by the department or unless that pupil has been exempted under 20-5-405.
(2) The governing authority shall conform with the provisions of the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and its implementing regulations at 34 CFR, part 99.
(3) A student's health records, including information related to immunizations received and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1386.1
immunization exemptions, are considered part of the student's education record and are protected from
disclosure as provided in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974. Consistent with the provisions
of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, deidentified, aggregated data, including data
provided pursuant to the reporting requirements of [section 1], are not protected from disclosure by this
subsection (3)."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 5, part 4, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 5, part 4, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****